North Carolina statutes. Chapter 35B. Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.
Article 4. Registration and Recognition of Orders From Other States.

§ 35B-36.
Registration of guardianship of the person orders.

If a guardian of the person has been appointed in another state and a petition for the adjudication of incompetence or an application for the appointment of a guardian of the person is not pending in this State, the guardian of the person appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the guardianship of the person order in this State by filing as a foreign judgment in a court, in any appropriate county of this State, certified copies of the order and letters of office.

History.

2016-72, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 1 enacted this section as

G.S. 35B-19

. It has been renumbered as this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to otherwise affect the requirements for seeking an ancillary guardianship under

G.S. 35A-1280

or for petitioning the court for the removal of personalty from the State under

G.S. 35A-1281

.”

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 4, provides: “This act becomes effective December 1, 2016, and applies to multistate guardianship and protective proceedings initiated on or after that date. Articles 1, 3, and 4 of Chapter 35B of the General Statutes, as enacted by Section 1 of this act, and

G.S. 35B-22

and

G.S. 35B-23

[now

G.S. 35B-45

and

G.S. 35B-46

], as enacted by Section 1 of this act, apply to proceedings initiated prior to December 1, 2016, regardless of whether an incompetency, guardianship, or protective order has been issued.”

§ 35B-37.
Registration of protective orders and general guardianship orders.

If a guardian of the estate or general guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition for the adjudication of incompetence or an application for the issuance of a protective order is not pending in this State, the guardian of the estate or general guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the protective order or general guardianship in this State by filing as a foreign judgment in a court of this State, in any county in which property belonging to the protected person is located, certified copies of the order and letters of office and of any bond.

History.

2016-72, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 1 enacted this section as

G.S. 35B-20

. It has been renumbered as this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to otherwise affect the requirements for seeking an ancillary guardianship under

G.S. 35A-1280

or for petitioning the court for the removal of personalty from the State under

G.S. 35A-1281

.”

§ 35B-38.
Effect of registration.

Upon registration of a general guardianship, guardianship of the person, or protective order from another state, the general guardian, guardian of the person, or guardian of the estate may exercise in this State all powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of this State, including maintaining actions and proceedings in this State and, if the general guardian, guardian of the person, or guardian of the estate is not a resident of this State, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.

A court of this State may grant any relief available under this Chapter and other law of this State to enforce a registered order.

History.

2016-72, s. 1.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 1 enacted this section as

G.S. 35B-21

. It has been renumbered as this section at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 2016-72, s. 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed to otherwise affect the requirements for seeking an ancillary guardianship under

G.S. 35A-1280

or for petitioning the court for the removal of personalty from the State under

G.S. 35A-1281

.”

§§ 35B-39 through 35B-44.

Reserved for future codification purposes.